Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.710

Availability of information.

Information contained in the files and records of the section relative to the commission of any crime by any person shall be considered privileged and shall not be made public or disclosed for any personal purpose or in any civil court proceedings except upon a written order of the judge of a court wherein such civil proceedings are had. All information contained in the files of the section relative to criminal records and personal histories of persons arrested for the commission of a crime shall be available to all criminal justice agencies upon the filing of an application as provided in RCW 43.43.705.

Although no application for information has been made to the section as provided in RCW 43.43.705, the section may transmit such information in the chief's discretion, to such agencies as are authorized by RCW 43.43.705 to make application for it.

[ 1995 c 369 s 13; 1987 c 486 s 11; 1986 c 266 s 87; 1985 c 201 s 9; 1979 ex.s. c 36 s 7. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 30 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.